Florida, session 2026, HB1385.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 499.02955, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
499.02955 Experimental Treatment Access Trust Fund.—
(1) There is created in the State Treasury the
Experimental Treatment Access Trust Fund within the Department
of Health, from which the Legislature may appropriate funds for
the purpose of assisting eligible patients who are residents of
this state with costs associated with travel to receive
experimental treatment or partial care costs under this section.
(2) Each licensed experimental treatment center may
contribute 2 percent of net annual profits from experimental
treatments to the Experimental Treatment Access Trust Fund, or
may provide at no cost experimental treatment care in an
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1385-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1385 2026
equivalent amount as adopted by rule by the department.
(3) In accordance with s. 19(f)(2), Art. III of the State
Constitution, the Experimental Treatment Access Trust Fund
shall, unless terminated sooner, be terminated on July 1, 2030.
Before its termination, the trust fund shall be reviewed as
provided in s. 215.3206(1).
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026, but
only if HB 1381 or similar legislation is adopted in the same
legislative session or an extension thereof and becomes a law.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1385-00